Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB480.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 45A.035 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet shall have power and authority over, and may, except
as otherwise expressly provided in this code, adopt regulations pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A and consistent
with this code governing the purchasing, management, and control of any and all supplies, services, and
construction, and other items required to be purchased by the Commonwealth. The secretary shall consider and
decide matters of policy with regard to state procurement. The secretary shall have the power of review with
respect to the implementation of administrative regulations and policy determinations.
(2) Administrative regulations shall be promulgated governing the following:
(a) Conditions and procedures for delegations of purchasing authority;
(b) Prequalification, suspension, debarment, and reinstatement of prospective bidders;
(c) Small purchase procedures;
(d) Conditions and procedures for the purchase of items for resale;
(e) Conditions and procedures for the purchase of agricultural products in accordance with KRS 45A.645;
(f) Conditions and procedures for the use of source selection methods authorized by this code, including
emergency purchases;
(g) Opening and rejection of bids or offers, consideration of alternate bids, and waiver of informalities in
offers;
(h) Confidentiality of technical data and trade secrets information submitted by actual or prospective
bidders or offerors;
(i) Partial, progressive, and multiple awards;
(j) Supervision of storerooms and inventories, including determination of appropriate stock levels and the
management, transfer, sale, or other disposal of state-owned property;
(k) Definitions and classes of contractual services and procedures for acquiring them;
(l) An appeals process to resolve disputes arising from specifications requiring items deemed to be
equivalent or a sole brand as specified in KRS 45A.170;[ and]
(m) Use of reverse auctions as defined in KRS 45A.070; and
(n) Policies and procedures governing timely payments, partial payments, reimbursement, and resolution
for contract payments in violation of KRS 45.453 and Section 2 of this Act.
The secretary may promulgate other administrative regulations as deemed advisable to carry out the purposes
of this code.
SECTION 2. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 45A IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Purchasing agency" means a unit or body of state government that receives goods or services from
a contractor or vendor; and
(b) "Undisputed amount" means a good-faith, valid, accurate, and timely request for payment that has
been submitted to an entity owing money, and for which the entity has reviewed and confirmed that
the money is due and owing.
(2) All contracts shall include but not be limited to the following provisions for:
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

2 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(a) Timely payments in accordance with KRS 45.451;
(b) Penalties for nonpayment. Payments that are not timely received shall be subject to a penalty:
1. In accordance with KRS 45.454, and except as provided in KRS 371.405, an interest penalty of
one percent (1%) shall be applied and added to any undisputed amount for each month or
fraction thereof after thirty (30) business days following the receipt of the goods or services, or
receipt of the invoice by the purchasing agency; or
2. In accordance with the payment terms of the contract;
(c) Addressing partial payment. Partial payment terms shall be included to:
1. Allow disbursement of partial payment for undisputed amounts in the invoice or an agreed-
upon payment process for goods received or services performed that are not rejected or
deficient; or
2. Not allow disbursement of partial payment for goods received or services performed that are
not rejected or deficient;
(d) A payment process for the disbursement of funds. When invoices are utilized for payment, terms shall
be included for the invoice requirements, including form, format, delivery, necessary information,
supporting documentation, and communication and notification procedures for complete invoices.
For deliverables-based contracts, terms shall be included to establish milestones that shall be fully
met before payment;
(e) A payment schedule that may include an initial disbursement of funds upon execution of the contract
for project initiation; and
(f) A payment resolution process in accordance with subsection (7)(c) of this section.
(3) Any undisputed amount shall be paid:
(a) Within thirty (30) business days of receipt of the goods, services, or contractor's invoice; or
(b) In accordance with the negotiated payment terms of the contract.
(4) (a) The purchasing agency shall make a good-faith effort of notifying the contractor or vendor that an
invoice has been rejected, of any errors in an invoice, or any requirement of additional or missing
information in an invoice within fifteen (15) business days from receipt of the goods, services, or
invoice, or in accordance with the terms of the contract.
(b) 1. If the purchasing agency transmits a rejection notice to the contractor or vendor, there shall
be a ten (10) calendar day correction period for the contractor or vendor to remedy any
problems in the delivery of a good or service or submit a corrected invoice to fulfill the
approval requirements. Utilization of the ten (10) calendar day correction period shall not
create a new date of submission or receipt for all items included in the invoice or terms of the
contract and shall not be considered a new invoice for calculation of the late payment fee
pursuant to KRS 45.454.
2. If a contractor or vendor fails to remedy the problem with the good or service, or fails to
submit a corrected invoice within the ten (10) calendar day correction period, the submitted
invoice shall be considered a new invoice with a new date of submission for calculation of the
late payment fee pursuant to KRS 45.454.
(5) In accordance with KRS 45.458, the interest penalty shall be paid by the purchasing agency and the amount
of the payments shall not be deducted from the contract budget, and modifications shall not be made to the
budget of the contract, the total award of the contract, funds encumbered or obligated for the contract, or
total amount available to fulfill the contract agreement as awarded by the contracting agency.
(6) If a contractor or vendor has not received payment within thirty (30) business days for an undisputed
amount and has executed a loan, line of credit, revolving credit, or other financial instrument in order to
fulfill the obligations and continue performance of the contract, the contractor or vendor may recover from
the purchasing agency the interest and costs of credit borne until the date payment has been issued.
(7) The secretary shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A relating to
contract payments no later than October 1, 2026, to implement this section. The administrative regulations
shall include:

CHAPTER 147 3
(a) Procedures for correcting an invoice submission error when the purchasing agency does not reject
the goods or services received;
(b) Procedures for partial payment of invoices by a purchasing agency for portions of an invoice; and
(c) A payment resolution process to resolve late payment claims by contractors or vendors that includes
but is not limited to:
1. That a contractor may notify the purchasing agency the payment is overdue and information
to include when a payment has not been received within the thirty (30) day period after receipt
of an invoice;
2. The method and manner payment disputes shall be submitted to the purchasing agency for
resolution by the secretary;
3. Information required to be included when a contractor or vendor submits an administrative
payment dispute;
4. The time period by which the purchasing agency shall submit a response to the secretary and
contractor or vendor, not to exceed ten (10) days;
5. The time period for the secretary to issue a determination or written notice not to exceed thirty
(30) days from submission of a payment dispute; and
6. The requirement for the purchasing agency to issue payment within five (5) business days
from when the determination or written notice establishes the total payment due. The secretary
may grant an extension to pay upon receipt of a joint request between the contractor and
purchasing agency.
(8) The Finance and Administration Cabinet shall make the payment resolution process to resolve a late
payment claim with instructions for contractors and vendors available on its website no later than October
1, 2026.
(9) (a) Beginning on July 1, 2027, the Finance and Administration Cabinet shall submit a written report
every six (6) months to the Legislative Research Commission for referral to:
1. The Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and Revenue, or House and Senate Standing
Committees on Appropriations and Revenue, as appropriate; and
2. The Interim Joint Committee on State Government, or Senate Standing Committee on State
and Local Government and House Standing Committee on State Government, as appropriate.
(b) The report shall include the quantity of late payment contract disputes submitted to the secretary of
the Finance and Administration Cabinet, including but not limited to:
1. Purchasing agency at issue;
2. Unpaid amount alleged or disputed;
3. Duration of late payment claimed; and
4. Determination issued.
Became law without Governor's signature April 14, 2026.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version